Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 1

General Provisions

12-1-101. Acceptance of gifts.

The governor is authorized to accept, on behalf of the state, gifts of real estate or personal property upon such terms and conditions and for such uses and purposes as may be agreed upon by the grantor or donor thereof and the governor.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the commissioner or appointing authority of any executive branch department or agency of state government is authorized to accept, on behalf of their department or agency, gifts of personal property with a value not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000). Any gift with a value exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) must be accepted by the governor pursuant to subsection (a).

Any gift accepted pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) must be reported to the commissioner of finance and administration and to the director of the fiscal review committee within thirty (30) days of acceptance. The commissioner shall maintain a registry of such gifts that is available for public inspection.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, diminish, supersede or otherwise alter specific authority of commissioners or appointing authorities to accept and receive gifts or donations that is otherwise granted elsewhere in this code.

Acts 1941, ch. 129, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 186.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-101; Acts 2005, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross-References. Acceptance of gifts in aid of emergency prevention, mitigation, preparedness, response or recovery, §58-2-109.

Attorney General Opinions. There would be no legal prohibition against the building of a bridge on a state road by a nonprofit foundation, provided that there was a prior contract between the department of transportation and the foundation, pursuant to T.C.A. §54-5-109, and that, upon completion of the bridge, the planned conveyance of the bridge to the state could be accomplished pursuant to T.C.A. §12-1-101, assuming the governor and the foundation agree as to terms and conditions of the transfer, as well as to uses and purposes of the property, OAG 02-103, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (10/01/02).

12-1-102. Authority for purchase of federal surplus property.

Notwithstanding any statute, public or private, providing the details of purchases on behalf of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, the state, or any political subdivision thereof, may purchase any surplus property offered for sale by the United States government from such government in such manner and on such terms as may be agreed upon between the seller and the buyer, including the right to execute deferred payment obligations and to make such purchases without taking bids or making advertisements therefor; provided, that all such purchases should be made by the agency of the state or political subdivision charged by existing or future law, with the authority to make purchases generally for the buyer.

Acts 1945, ch. 16, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 423.2 (Williams, § 423.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-102.

Cross-References. Acquisition of federal surplus property through state board of education, §49-1-304.

Central procurement office charged with state purchases, §12-3-101.

Purchase of federal surplus property, §§12-1-101 —12-1-105.

12-1-103. Commission to purchase federal property.

There is appointed a commission to be composed of the governor, state treasurer and attorney general and reporter, which commission is clothed with authority to purchase from the federal government such property as the federal government may offer for sale and which may be used advantageously, in the discretion of the commission, by any department or agency of the state.

Acts 1945, ch. 168, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1032.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-103.

12-1-104. Federal improvements on state land.

This commission may contract for and purchase any improvements or installations which may be located on lands belonging to the state and which have been placed on such lands by the federal government, or by any agency thereof, with authority reserved in the federal government to remove such improvements or installations, if it so elects. The terms and conditions of any such purchase shall be agreed upon by this commission and the proper representatives of the federal government.

Acts 1945, ch. 168, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1032.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-104.

12-1-105. Payment for federal property.

Payment for any purchases made under §§12-1-103 and12-1-104 shall be made out of any money in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated, and notwithstanding any contrary provision in any other statute.

Acts 1945, ch. 168, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1032.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-105.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

12-1-106. Land acquired by commissioner — Payment.

The commissioner of any department of the state, with the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration, is authorized to acquire land on behalf of the state either by purchase or condemnation for use for public purposes. The land shall be paid for out of any available funds in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated.

Acts 1943, ch. 89, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3166.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-106; Acts 1984, ch. 770, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Property acquired for defense purposes, title 58, ch. 1, part 5.

12-1-107. Application for purchase of land.

In the event it becomes necessary to so acquire any land under authority of §§12-1-106 —12-1-108, the commissioner of the department seeking to have the same acquired shall make a request in writing to the governor, giving in detail the location of the land sought to be acquired, its probable cost, the necessity for the acquisition and all other information the commissioner deems material, and if the governor approves the request for acquisition, the commissioner shall then be authorized to acquire the land.

Acts 1943, ch. 89, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3166.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-107.

12-1-108. Condemnation request.

In the event it becomes necessary to condemn the land, the commissioner and the governor shall request the attorney general and reporter in writing to file the proper condemnation proceedings, which shall be under the general laws relating to the acquisition of land for public purposes by condemnation, authority being granted for that purpose.

Acts 1943, ch. 89, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3166.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-108.

Cross-References. Eminent domain by public agencies, title 29, ch. 17, parts 1-8.

12-1-109. Land for institutional water or sewage system.

The state, acting through the department or agency having the power of supervision over any penal, charitable, reformatory, or educational institution belonging to the state, with the approval of the governor, shall have the right to acquire by purchase, donation, or condemnation on behalf of the state, all necessary land with interests therein, including necessary flowage rights, rights of riparian owners on any stream within the state, and easements for pipelines for the purpose of the installation of a system of waterworks or sewage disposal, for the use of such institution. The state shall make compensation in such case to the owner of such land or rights out of any funds belonging to the state, not otherwise appropriated.

Acts 1929, ch. 121, §§ 1, 2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3165, 3166; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-109.

Cross-References. Private property not to be taken for public use without just compensation, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 21.

12-1-110. Joint purchase of art.

Any state agency authorized to purchase a work of art is authorized to enter into contracts with a private or public foundation to jointly purchase a work of art as defined in § 47-25-1002. Such contracts shall be entered into in accordance with state purchasing statutes and regulations.

Such contracts, to be mutually agreed upon, shall provide that neither party may dispose of its partial ownership without the consent of the other, and shall set forth in detail the proportion of ownership of each party, the alternation of custody of the work of art, provision for conservation treatment, if needed, provision for transport between the parties, and the conditions of display and care to be observed while the work of art is in the control of each party.

No such contract shall be binding on the state agency until it is reviewed and approved by the office of the attorney general and reporter as to its legality for new purchases.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to property already owned by the state, nor shall it impair the obligation of state agencies to dispose of their ownership or part ownership in property in accordance with applicable state statutes and regulations governing disposal of state property.

Acts 1988, ch. 598, § 1.

12-1-111. Continued validity of agreement between local government and adjoining private property owner for agricultural use of government land upon sale of such land to another local government.

If any real property owned by a local government, where a written agreement was executed allowing adjoining private property owners to utilize the local government's real property for agricultural use when the property was transferred by execution of a quitclaim deed to the local government, is then sold or transferred to another local government or to a state agency, then the written agreement shall continue to be valid.

Any local government transferring or selling real property as described in subsection (a) shall give written notice to any affected private property owners thirty (30) days prior to the sale or transfer.

If any private property owner is required to cease agricultural use of any real property that is sold or transferred to a state agency pursuant to subsection (a), then the state agency shall be responsible for providing information regarding potential grant funding for fencing and watering livestock and may work with the owner to seek such funding, if such funding is available; provided, that the owner shall be responsible for maintaining any of the resulting improvements.

Acts 2015, ch. 496, § 1.